Illinois, session 104th, HB744.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Corporate Fiduciary Act is amended by 5changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 620/1-1)  (from Ch. 17, par. 1551-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short Title. This Act shall be known and and may 8be cited as the "Corporate Fiduciary Act".9(Source: P.A. 85-858.)